Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. Generally

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 18-6-101.
Authority to acquire and dispose of sites generally.

Each board of county commissioners may purchase or receive by donation or otherwise a site for a county courthouse, jail or both at the county seat of the county or a site for a county jail at any location within the county, and may erect thereon a suitable courthouse, jail or both if in the county seat, or a suitable jail if not located in the county seat. If such a building is to replace one presently in use the board may sell the building to be replaced.

If a courthouse or jail to be replaced is sold it shall be sold at public auction to the highest bidder for cash or on terms of payment as determined by the board and in case of deferred payments, security is required satisfactory to the board. No sale shall occur until public notice has been given by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publishing in the county’s designated official newspaper once a week for two (2) weeks. The notice shall specify the time, place and terms of sale. All proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the county treasury and only expended for a site or toward the erection of a new building to replace the one sold.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 1026, 1027; C.S. 1910, §§ 1079, 1080; C.S. 1920, §§ 1312, 1313; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-402, 29-403; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-401, 26-402; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-290, 18-291; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2000, ch. 38, § 1; 2014 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), deleted “such” following “cash or on” in the first sentence and substituted “given by posting on the county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publishing in the county's designated official newspaper once a week for two (2) weeks” for “given in some news paper published and of general circulation in the county once a week for four (4) weeks” in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Section 1, ch. 66, C.L. 1876, provided as follows: “That there be established and kept in every organized county of this territory, by the board of county commissioners at the expense of the county, as hereinafter provided, a jail for the safekeeping of prisoners lawfully committed.”

This section was omitted from the 1899 compilation and all subsequent statutes. The section seems never to have been repealed and has not been specifically superseded; consequently, it is herein set out as a note in order to make it available.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of county as to lease or sublease of property owned or leased by it, 47 ALR3d 19.